Nebraska, session 109, LB1073.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB1073 LB1073
2026 2026
Section 1. Section 60-462, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
60-462 Sections 60-462 to 60-4,189 and section 2 of this act shall
be known and may be cited as the Motor Vehicle Operator's License Act.
Sec. 2. (1) For purposes of this section, commercial motor vehicle
driver training means any training course or educational program that is
offered in this state for the purpose of teaching or training any person
how to operate a commercial motor vehicle.
(2) The curriculum for any commercial motor vehicle driver training
that begins on or after January 1, 2027, shall include a minimum of
thirty minutes of antitrafficking training as prescribed by the Attorney
General.
(3)(a) No later than December 1, 2026, the Attorney General shall
prescribe the curriculum and training materials for the antitrafficking
training that is required under subsection (2) of this section.
(b) The Attorney General shall review and update such curriculum and
training materials at least once every three years to account for changes
and trends in human trafficking.
(4) The Attorney General may collaborate with any organization that
specializes in and offers training materials about the recognition,
prevention, and reporting of human trafficking for commercial motor
vehicle drivers.
(5) The Attorney General may adopt and promulgate rules and
regulations to carry out this section.
Sec. 3. Original section 60-462, Revised Statutes Cumulative
Supplement, 2024, is repealed.
-2-